Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-401
City council; meetings, regular and special; quorum.

Regular meetings of the city council of a city of the first class shall be held at such times as may be fixed by ordinance and special meetings whenever called by the mayor or any four city council members. A majority of all the members elected to the city council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, except as otherwise required by law, but a less number may adjourn, from time to time, and compel the attendance of absent members. An affirmative vote of not less than one-half of the elected members shall be required for the transaction of any business.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 16, p. 233;

R.S.1913, § 4894;

C.S.1922, § 4062;

C.S.1929, § 16-401;

R.S.1943, § 16-401;

Laws 1975, LB 118, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 652, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 70;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 22.
September 1, 2019
Any business that might have been transacted at the regular meeting may be transacted at an adjournment thereof, where the adjournment is taken to a fixed date, unless a specified provision is made to the contrary. Ex parte Wolf, 14 Neb. 24, 14 N.W. 660 (1883).